District of Columbia statutes.
19-1304.05

Charitable purposes; enforcement.

(a)

A charitable trust may be created for the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, governmental or municipal purposes, or other purposes the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

(b)

If the terms of a charitable trust do not indicate or otherwise provide for the selection of a particular charitable purpose or beneficiary, the court may select one or more charitable purposes or beneficiaries. The selection must be consistent with the settlor’s intention to the extent it can be ascertained.

(c)

The settlor of a charitable trust, among others, may maintain a proceeding to enforce the trust.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 405 of the Uniform Trust Code.
This section is referenced in § 19-1301.03.